test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_orrood_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



  Verb - orroođ: # MLO checked
    orroođ+V+Inf: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: orom
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: oroh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: oro
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: orovettee
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: orroov
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: orovetteđ
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: oroh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: uurrum
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: uurruh
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: oroi
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: oroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: oroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: oroin
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: oroim
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: oroid
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: urruu
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: oroččim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: oroččih
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: oroččij
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: oroččáim
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: oroččáid
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: oroččáin
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: oroččijm
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: oroččijd
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: oroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ooroom
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: oorooh
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: oorooš
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: orožeen
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: ooroošvettee
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: orožává
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: orožep
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: ooroošvetteđ
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: orožeh
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg2: oro
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Sg3: oros
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du1: orroon
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du2: orroo
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Du3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl1: orroop
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl2: orroođ
    orroođ+V+Imprt+Pl3: orroos
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: oro
    orroođ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: orroom
    orroođ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: oroččii
    orroođ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: urruu
    orroođ+V+PrsPrc: orroo
    orroođ+V+PrfPrc: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio+Nom: orroom
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ess: oromin
    orroođ+V+Actio+Loc: oromist
    orroođ+V+Actio+Ill: oromân
    orroođ+V+Actio+Com: orodijn
    orroođ+V+VAbess: orohánnáá
